src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                      !!!Rumanian morphological analyser
! ========================================================================== !


! ======================
!! !!!Sublexica for Noun
! ======================


! Sone 2a Deklinasjonsklassane
! ============================

! m
! -

LEXICON m ! default pl -i
 +N+Msc+Nom+Sg+Indef:       # ;
   +N+Msc+Nom+Sg+Def:%>ul   # ;
 +N+Msc+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>i    # ;
   +N+Msc+Nom+Pl+Def:%>ii   # ;
 +N+Msc+Gen+Sg+Indef:       # ;
   +N+Msc+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ului # ;
 +N+Msc+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>i    # ;
   +N+Msc+Gen+Pl+Def:%>ilor # ;
 +N+Msc+Voc+Sg+Indef:e      # ;
   +N+Msc+Voc+Sg+Def:%>ule  # ;
   +N+Msc+Voc+Pl+Def:%>ilor # ;


! f
! -

LEXICON f  ! default pl -e
 +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Indef:       # ;
   +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Def:%>a    # ;
 +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>e    # ;

   +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Def:%>ele  # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Indef:e      # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ei   # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>e    # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Def:%>ele  # ;
 +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Indef:ă      # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Def:%>ă    # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:%>elor # ;

LEXICON f_i  !  pl -uri
 +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Indef:       # ;
   +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Def:%>a    # ;
 +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>i    # ;

   +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Def:%>ele  # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Indef:e      # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ei   # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>e    # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Def:%>ele  # ;
 +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Indef:ă      # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Def:%>ă    # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:%>elor # ;

LEXICON f_uri  !  pl -uri
 +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Indef:        # ;
   +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Def:%>a     # ;
 +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>uri   # ;

   +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Def:%>urile # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Indef:uri     # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ei    # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>e     # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Def:%>ele   # ;
 +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Indef:ă       # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Def:%>ă     # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:%>elor  # ;

LEXICON f_le  !  pl -uri
 +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Indef:       # ;
   +N+Fem+Nom+Sg+Def:%>a    # ;
 +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>le   # ;

   +N+Fem+Nom+Pl+Def:%>lele # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Indef:le     # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ei   # ;
 +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>e    # ;
   +N+Fem+Gen+Pl+Def:%>ele  # ;
 +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Indef:ă      # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Sg+Def:%>ă    # ;
   +N+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:%>elor # ;

LEXICON f_0
  f ; ! not done


! n
! -

LEXICON n
 +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Def:%>ul     # ;
 +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>uri    # ;

   +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Def:%>urile  # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ului   # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>uri    # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Def:%>urilor # ;

LEXICON n_uri
  n ; ! -uri default ???

LEXICON n_e
 +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Def:%>ul     # ;
 +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>e      # ;

   +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Def:%>ele    # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ului   # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>uri    # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Def:%>urilor # ;


LEXICON n_i
 +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Nom+Sg+Def:%>ul     # ;
 +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Indef:%>i      # ;

   +N+Neu+Nom+Pl+Def:%>ile    # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Indef:         # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Sg+Def:%>ilui   # ;
 +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Indef:%>i      # ;
   +N+Neu+Gen+Pl+Def:%>urilor # ;

LEXICON n_ă
  n ; ! not done
